Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-15] Accreditation and standards.
All treatment programs and assessment programs providing services pursuant to
this chapter shall be accredited by the department of health. In addition, the
department of health shall designate accredited treatment programs and
assessment programs that have special skills in providing treatment services
and assessment services to persons involved in or referred from the criminal
justice system. The department of health shall develop program standards to
ensure the provision of the full continuum of care for persons ordered to
participate in a treatment program pursuant to this chapter. The standards
shall address, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Defining the continuum of care;

(2) Matching persons to appropriate treatment
programs; and

(3) Recruiting and hiring practices representative of
the population to be treated, including individuals in recovery from alcohol
and other drug abuse and addiction. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next